ko: 측정 단위: 보드 피트(bft); 섭씨(°C); 센티미터(cm); 컵(c); 화씨(°F); 피트(ft); 초당 피트(ft/s); 인치(in); 시간당 킬로미터(km/h); 노트(kn); 리터(l); 미터(m); 초당 미터(m/s); 마이크로미터(μm); 시간당 마일(mph); 밀리리터(ml); 밀리미터(mm); 쿼트(qt); 지정되지 않음; 야드(yd); 기타
sl-SI: Merske enote: Prostorninski čevelj za les (bft); Celzija (°C); Centimetri (cm); Skodelice (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Čevlji (ft); Čevlji na sekundo (ft/s); Palci (in); Kilometri na uro (km/h); Vozli (kn); Litri (l); Metri (m); Metri na sekundo (m/s); Mikrometri (μm); Milje na uro (mph); Mililitri (ml); Milimetri (mm); Kvarti (qt); Neopredeljeno; Jardi (yd); Drugo
zh-CN: 计量单位制: 板英尺 (bft); 摄氏度 (°C); 厘米 (cm); 杯 (c); 华氏度 (°F); 英尺 (ft); 英尺每秒 (ft/s); 英寸（英寸）; 公里每小时 (km/h); 节 (kn); 升 (l); 米 (m); 米/秒 (m/s); 微米 (μm); 英里每小时 (mph); 毫升（ml）; 毫米 (mm); 夸脱 (qt); 未指定; 码 (yd); 其他
tr: Ölçü Birimleri: Board feet (bft); Santigrat (°C); Santimetre (cm); Cup (c); Fahrenhayt (°F); Fit (ft); Fit bölü saniye (ft/sn); İnç (inç); Kilometre bölü saat (km/sa); Knot (kn); Litre (l); Metre (m); Metre bölü saniye (m/sn); Mikrometre (μm); Mil bölü saat (mph); Mililitre (ml); Milimetre (mm); Quart (qt); Belirtilmemiş; Yard (yd); Diğer
ro-RO: Unități de măsurare: Board feet (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimetri (cm); Cupe (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Picioare (ft); Picioare pe secundă (ft/s); Inchi (in); Kilometri pe oră (km/h); Noduri (kn); Litri (l); Metri (m); Metri pe secundă (m/s); Micrometri (μm); Mile pe oră (mph); Mililitri (ml); Milimetri (mm); Quarts (qt); Nespecificat; Yarzi (yd); Altele
th: หน่วยวัด: บอร์ดฟุต (bft); เซลเซียส (°C); เซนติเมตร (ซม.); ถ้วย; ฟาเรนไฮต์ (°F); ฟุต; ฟุตต่อวินาที (ฟุต/วินาที); นิ้ว; กิโลเมตรต่อชั่วโมง (กม./ชม.); นอต; ลิตร (ล.); เมตร (ม.); เมตรต่อวินาที (ม./วินาที); ไมโครเมตร (μm); ไมล์ต่อชั่วโมง (mph); มิลลิลิตร (มล.); มิลลิเมตร (มม.); ควอร์ต; ไม่ระบุ; หลา; อื่นๆ
ja: 計測単位: ボードフィート (BFT); 摂氏 (°C); センチメートル (cm); カップ (c); 華氏 (°F); フィート (フィート); フィート/秒 (ft/s); インチ (in); キロメートル毎時 (km/h); ノット (kn); リットル (l); メートル (m); メートル/秒 (m/s); マイクロメートル (μm); マイル毎時 (mph); ミリリットル (ml); ミリメートル (mm); クォート (qt); 不特定; ヤード (yd); その他
fi: Mittayksiköt: Lautajalkaa (bft); Celsiusastetta (°C); Senttimetriä (cm); Kuppia (c); Fahrenheit-astetta (°F); Jalkaa (ft); Jalkaa sekunnissa (ft/s); Tuumaa (in); Kilometriä tunnissa (km/h); Solmua (kn); Litraa (l); Metriä (m); Metriä sekunnissa (m/s); Mikrometriä (μm); Mailia tunnissa (mph); Millilitraa (ml); Millimetriä (mm); Quartia (qt); Määrittelemätön; Jaardia (yd); Muu
el: Μονάδες μέτρησης: Πόδια σανίδας (bft); Κελσίου (°C); εκατοστά (cm); Κύπελλα (γ); Φαρενάιτ (°F); Πόδια (ft); Πόδια ανά δευτερόλεπτο (ft/s); ίντσες (in); Χιλιόμετρα ανά ώρα (χλμ/ώρα); Κόμποι (kn); Λίτρα (l); Μέτρα (m); Μέτρα ανά δευτερόλεπτο (m/s); Μικρόμετρα; Μίλια ανά ώρα (μίλια/ώρα); χιλιοστόλιτρα (ml); Χιλιοστά (mm); Τεταρτάκια (qt); Απροσδιόριστος; Γιάρδες (Yd); Άλλο
da: Måleenheder: Bordfødder (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimeter (cm); Kopper (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Fødder (ft); Fod pr. sekund (ft/s); Tommer (in); Kilometer i timen (km/t); Knob (kn); Liter (l); Meter (m); Meter pr. sekund (m/s); Mikrometer (μm); Miles i timen (mph); Milliliter (ml); Millimeter (mm); Kvarte (qt); Uspecificeret; Yards (yd); Andet
es: Unidades de medida: Pies tablares (bft); Celsius (°C); Centímetros (cm); Tazas (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Pies (ft); Pies por segundo (ft/s); Pulgadas (in); Kilómetros por hora (km/h); Nudos (kn); Litros (l); Metros (m); Metros por segundo (m/s); Micrómetros (μm); Millas por hora (mph); Mililitros (ml); Milímetros (mm); Cuartos (qt); No especificado; Yardas (yd); Otros
hu: Mértékegység: Deszkaláb (bft); Celsius (°C); Centiméter (cm); Csésze (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Láb (ft); Láb per másodperc (ft/s); Hüvelyk (in); Kilométer per óra (km/h); Csomó (kn); Liter (l); Méter (m); Méter per másodperc (m/s); Mikrométer (μm); Mérföld per óra (mph); Milliliter (ml); Milliméter (mm); Kvart (qt); Meghatározatlan; Yard (yd); Egyéb
sv: Måttenheter: Board feet (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimeter (cm); Koppar (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Fot (ft); Fot per sekund (ft/s); Tum (in); Kilometer per timme (km/h); Knop (kn); Liter (l); Meter (m); Meter per sekund (m/s); Mikrometer (μm); Miles per timme (mph); Milliliter (ml); Millimeter (mm); Quart (qt); Ospecificerad; Yards (yd); Övrigt
pl: Jednostki miary: Stopy deski (bft); Celsjusza (°C); Centymetry (cm); Miarki (c); Fahrenheita (°F); Stopy (ft); Stopy na sekundę (ft/s); Cale (in); Kilometry na godzinę (km/h); Węzły (kn); Litry (l); Metry (m); Metry na sekundę (m/s); Mikrometry (μm); Mile na godzinę (mph); Mililitry (ml); Milimetry (mm); Kwarty (qt); Nie wskazano; Jardy (yd); Inne
nl: Meeteenheden: Boardvoeten (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimeter (cm); Kopjes (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Voeten (ft); Voeten per seconde (ft/s); Inch (inch); Kilometer per uur (km/u); Knopen (kn); Liters (l); Meter (m); Meter per seconde (m/s); Micrometer (μm); Mijl per uur (mph); Milliliters (ml); Millimeter (mm); Quarts (qt); Niet gespecificeerd; Yards (yd); Andere
nb: Måleenheter: Bordføtter (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimeter (cm); Kopper (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Føtter (ft); Fot per sekund (ft/s); Tommer (in); Kilometer i timen (km/t); Knopp (kn); Liter (I); Meter (m); Meter per sekund (m/s); Mikrometer (μm); Miles per time (mph); Milliliter (ml); Millimeter (mm); Quarts (qt); Uspesifisert; Yards (yd); Annet
it: Unità di misurazione: Piedi della tavola (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimetri (cm); Tazze (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Piedi (ft); Piedi al secondo (ft/s); Pollici (in); Chilometri orari (km/h); Nodi (kn); Litri (l); Metri (m); Metri al secondo (m/s); Micrometri (μm); Miglia orarie (mph); Millilitri (ml); Millimetri (mm); Quarti (qt); Non specificato; Iarde (yd); Altro
zh-TW: 測量單位: 板腳 (bft); 攝氏 (°C); 公分 (cm); 杯 (c); 華氏 (°F); 英尺（ft）; 英尺每秒 (ft/s); 英寸 (in); 公里每小時 (km/h); 節 (kn); 公升 (l); <公尺 (m)>; 米每秒 (m/s); 微米 (μm); 英哩每小時 (mph); 毫升 (ml); 公釐 (mm); 誇脫 (qt); 未指定; 碼 (yd); 其他
bg-BG: Мерни единици: Бордови футове (bft); Целзий (°C); Сантиметри (cm); Чаши (c); Фаренхайт (°F); Футове (ft); Футове в секунда (ft/s); Инчове (in); Километри в час (км/ч); Възела (kn); Литри (l); Метри (m); Метри в секунда (m/s); Микрометри (μm); Мили в час (mph); Милилитри (ml); Милиметри (mm); Кварти (qt); Неуточнено; Ярдове (yd); Други
cs: Měrné jednotky: Deskové stopy (bft); Stupně Celsia (°C); Centimetry (cm); Hrnky (c); Stupně Fahrenheita (°F); Stopy (ft); Stopy za sekundu (ft/s); Palce (in); Kilometry za hodinu (km/h); Uzly (kn); Litry (l); Metry (m); Metry za sekundu (m/s); Mikrometry (μm); Míle za hodinu (mph); Mililitry (ml); Milimetry (mm); Kvarty (qt); Nespecifikováno; Yardy (yd); Jiné
ru: Единицы измерения: Досковые футы (bft); Градусы Цельсия (°С); Сантиметры (см); Чашки (с); Градусы Фаренгейта (°F); Футы (фут); Футов в секунду (фут/с); Дюймы (дюймы); Километров в час (км/ч); Узлы (kn); Литры (л); Метры (м); Метров в секунду (м/с); Микрометры (мкм); Миль в час (миль/ч); Миллилитры (мл); Миллиметры (мм); Кварты (qt); Не указано; Ярды (yd); Другое
vi: Các đơn vị đo lường: Foot tấm ván (bft); Độ Celsius (°C); Centimet (cm); Cup (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Feet (ft); Feet trên giây (ft/s); Inch (in); Kilômét trên giờ (km/h); Hải lý (kn); Lít (l); Mét (m); Mét trên giây (m/s); Micromet (μm); Dặm trên giờ (mph); Mililit (ml); Milimet (mm); Quart (qt); Không xác định; Y-át (yd); Khác
fr: Unités de mesure: Pieds-planche (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimètres (cm); Tasses (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Pieds (pi); Pieds par seconde (ft/s); <pouces (po)>; Kilomètres par heure (km/h); Nœuds (kn); Litres (l); Mètres (m); Mètres par seconde (m/s); Micromètres (μm); Miles par heure (mph); Millilitres (ml); Millimètres (mm); Quarts (qt); Non spécifié; Yards (yd); Autre
de: Maßeinheiten: Board feet (bft); Celsius (°C); Zentimeter (cm); Cup (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Fuß (ft); Fuß pro Sekunde (ft/s); Zoll (in); Kilometer pro Stunde (km/h); Knoten (kn); Liter (l); Meter (m); Meter pro Sekunde (m/s); Mikrometer (μm); Meilen pro Stunde (mph); Milliliter (ml); Millimeter (mm); Quart (qt); Nicht spezifiziert; Yards (yd); Sonstiges
en: Units of measurement: Board feet (bft); Celsius (°C); Centimeters (cm); Cups (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Feet (ft); Feet per second (ft/s); Inches (in); Kilometers per hour (km/h); Knots (kn); Liters (l); Meters (m); Meters per second (m/s); Micrometers (μm); Miles per hour (mph); Milliliters (ml); Millimeters (mm); Quarts (qt); Unspecified; Yards (yd); Other
sk-SK: Jednotky merania: Nohy dosky (bft); Celzia (°C); Centimetre (cm); Poháre (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Stopy (ft); Stopy za sekundu (ft/s); Palce (in); Kilometre za hodinu (km/h); Uzly (kn); Litre (l); Metre (m); Metre za sekundu (m/s); Mikrometre (μm); Míle za hodinu (mph); Mililitre (ml); Milimetre (mm); Štvrtiny galónu (qt); Nešpecifikované; Yardy (yd); Iné
lt-LT: Matavimo vienetai: Medienos pėdos (bft); Celsijus (°C); Centimetrai (cm); Puodeliai (c); Farenheitas (°F); Pėdos (ft); Pėdos per sekundę (ft/s); Coliai (in); Kilometrai per valandą (km/h); Mazgai (kn); Litrai (l); Metrai (m); Metrai per sekundę (m/s); Mikrometrai (μm); Mylios per valandą (mph); Mililitrai (ml); Milimetrai (mm); Kvortos (qt); Nenurodyta; Jardai (yd); Kita
pt-BR: Unidades de medida: Board foot (bft); Celsius (°C); Centímetros (cm); Cups (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Pés (ft); Pés por segundo (ft/s); Polegadas (in); Quilômetros por hora (km/h); Nós (kn); Litros (l); Metros (m); Metros por segundo (m/s); Micrômetros (μm); Milhas por hora (mph); Mililitros (ml); Milímetros (mm); Quartos (qt); Não especificado; Jardas (jardas); Outro
hr-HR: Mjerne jedinice: Stopa ploče (bft); Celzij (°C); Centimetri (cm); Šalice (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Stope (ft); Stope u sekundi (ft/s); Inči (in); Kilometri na sat (km/h); Čvorovi (kn); Litre (l); Metri (m); Metri u sekundi (m/s); Mikrometri (μm); Milje na sat (mph); Mililitri (ml); Milimetri (mm); Kvarti (qt); Neodređeno; Jardi (yd); Ostalo
pt-PT: Unidades de medida: Pés quadrados (bft); Celsius (°C); Centímetros (cm); Chávenas (c); Fahrenheit (°F); Pés (ft); Pés por segundo (ft/s); Polegadas (in); Quilómetros por hora (km/h); Nós (kn); Litros (l); Metros (m); Metros por segundo (m/s); Micrómetros (μm); Milhas por hora (mph); Mililitros (ml); Milímetros (mm); Quartos (qt); Não especificado; Jardas (yd); Outro